District of Columbia statutes.
9-702

Powers and duties of Administrator.

The Administrator shall have control over, and responsibility for, the care, operation, maintenance, and protection of the airport, together with the power to make and amend such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to the proper exercise thereof.

June 29, 1940, 54 Stat. 687, ch. 444, § 2
1981 Ed., § 7-1102.
1973 Ed., § 7-1302.